District of Columbia statutes.
38-827.04

Administration.

Subject to appropriations, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall provide administrative and technical support to the Commission as necessary.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 704, 57 DCR 4779